Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1760.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 1-4-601, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-4-601. A. The court shall hold an adjudication


hearing following the filing of a petition alleging that a child is


deprived. The hearing shall be held not more than ninety (90)


calendar days following the filing of the petition. The child and


the child’s parents, guardian, or other legal custodian shall be


entitled to not less than twenty (20) days’ prior notice of the


hearing.


B. 1. The child shall be released from emergency custody in


the event the adjudication hearing is delayed beyond ninety (90)

Req. No. 3115 Page 1


days from the date the petition is filed unless the court issues a


written order with findings of fact supporting a determination that:


a. there exists reasonable suspicion that the health,


safety, or welfare of the child would be in imminent


danger if the child were returned to the home, and


b. there exists either an exceptional circumstance to


support the continuance of the child in emergency


custody or the parties and the guardian ad litem, if


any, agree to such continuance.


2. If the adjudicatory hearing is delayed pursuant to this


subsection, the emergency custody order shall expire unless the


hearing on the merits of the petition is held within one hundred


eighty (180) days after the actual removal of the child.


C. The release of a child from emergency custody due to the


failure of an adjudication hearing being held within the time frame


prescribed by this section shall not deprive the court of


jurisdiction over the child and the parties or authority to enter


temporary orders the court deems necessary to provide for the


health, safety, and welfare of the child pending the hearing on the


petition.


D. At the adjudication hearing, if the court finds that it is


in the best interest of the child, the court shall:





Req. No. 3115 Page 2


1. Accept a stipulation by the child’s parent, guardian, or


other legal custodian that the facts alleged in the petition are


true and correct;


2. Accept a stipulation by the child’s parent, guardian, or


other legal custodian that if the state presented its evidence


supporting the truth of the factual allegations in the petition to a


court of competent jurisdiction, such evidence would be sufficient


to meet the state’s burden of proving by a preponderance of the


evidence that the factual allegations are true and correct; or


3. Conduct conduct a nonjury trial to determine whether the


state has met its burden of proving by a preponderance of the


evidence beyond a reasonable doubt that the factual allegations in


the petition are true and correct.


E. 1. A decision determining a child to be deprived in a


nonjury trial shall be based on sworn testimony and ensure that each


parent’s due process rights have been fully respected.


2. The child, as a party to the proceeding, shall be given the


opportunity to cross-examine witnesses and to present a case in


chief if desired.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 1-4-706, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-4-706. A. 1. When a child has been adjudicated


deprived pursuant to the provisions of Section 1-4-603 of this


title, a dispositional hearing may be held on the same day as the

Req. No. 3115 Page 3


adjudication hearing, but in any event the hearing shall be held and


an order entered no later than forty (40) calendar days thereafter.


The dispositional hearing shall not be delayed absent a showing of


good cause and a finding by the court that the best interests of the


child will be served by granting the delay. The court shall set


forth the reasons why a delay is necessary and shall schedule the


hearing at the earliest possible time following the delay.


2. During the hearing all evidence, including oral and written


reports, relevant to the determination of the disposition best


serving the health, safety, and welfare of the child may be received


by the court and may be relied upon to the extent of that its


probative value even though not otherwise competent in the hearing


on the petition outweighs its prejudicial effect. The parties shall


be afforded a reasonable opportunity to examine the written reports


prepared for the court’s consideration prior to the dispositional


hearing and to controvert them. The hearing may be informal and


hearsay may be relied upon.


3. Any order concerning child support, visitation, or the legal


custody of the child entered in any other administrative or district


court proceeding shall be subject to modification by the juvenile


court during the pendency of the deprived action.


4. The court shall determine and order the individualized


service plan for the parties.



Req. No. 3115 Page 4


5. At the conclusion of the dispositional hearing, the court


shall schedule the dates and times for periodic review and


permanency hearings.


B. 1. If the child is removed from the custody of the child’s


parent, the court or the Department of Human Services, as


applicable, shall immediately consider concurrent permanency


planning, and, when appropriate, develop a concurrent plan so that


permanency may occur at the earliest opportunity. Consideration


should be given so that if reunification fails or is delayed, the


placement made is the best available placement to provide permanency


for the child.


2. The court shall further:


a. establish an initial permanency plan for the child,


and


b. determine if aggravated circumstances exist pursuant


to Section 1-4-809 of this title and whether


reunification services are appropriate for the child


and the child’s family.


3. When reunification with a parent or legal guardian is the


permanency plan and concurrent planning is indicated, the court


shall determine if efforts are being made to place the child in


accord with the concurrent permanency plan, including whether


appropriate in-state and out-of-state permanency placement options


have been identified and pursued.

Req. No. 3115 Page 5


4. Every effort shall be made to place the child with a


suitable relative of the child.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3115 BLB 1/14/2026 3:09:51 PM







































Req. No. 3115 Page 6